California statutes. Family Code
(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 42) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 85.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7578.

(a) Every signatory to a voluntary declaration of parentage shall be made a party to a proceeding to challenge the declaration.

(b) By signing a voluntary declaration, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction in this state in a proceeding to challenge the declaration, effective on the filing of the declaration with the Department of Child Support Services.

(c) The court shall not suspend the legal responsibilities arising from a voluntary declaration of parentage, including the duty to pay child support, during the pendency of a proceeding to challenge the voluntary declaration of parentage, unless the
 party challenging the declaration shows good cause.

(d) A party challenging a voluntary declaration of parentage has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

(e) If the judgment or order of the court is at variance with the child’s birth certificate, the court shall order that a new birth certificate be issued as prescribed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 102725) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) This section shall
 become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 43.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7580.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 7573, a voluntary declaration of parentage that is signed by a minor parent does not establish parentage until 60 days after both signatories have reached 18 years of age or are emancipated, whichever first occurs.

(b) A person who signs a voluntary declaration of parentage as a minor may rescind the voluntary declaration of parentage at any time up to 60 days after the signatory reaches 18 years of age or becomes emancipated, whichever first occurs.

(c) A voluntary declaration of parentage signed by a minor creates a rebuttable presumption for or against parentage until the date
 that it establishes parentage as specified in subdivision (a).

(d) A voluntary declaration of parentage signed by a minor shall be admissible as evidence in a civil action to establish parentage of the minor named in the voluntary declaration.

(e) A voluntary declaration of parentage that is signed by a minor shall not be admissible as evidence in a criminal prosecution for violation of Section 261.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 86.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7581.

The following provisions shall apply for voluntary declarations signed on or before December 31, 1996.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the child of a woman and a man executing a declaration of paternity under this chapter is conclusively presumed to be the man’s child. The presumption under this section has the same force and effect as the presumption under Section 7540.

(b) A voluntary declaration of paternity shall be recognized as the basis for the establishment of an order for child custody or support.

(c) In an action to rebut the presumption created by this section, a voluntary declaration of paternity shall be
 admissible as evidence to determine paternity of the child named in the voluntary declaration of paternity.

(d) The presumption established by this section may be rebutted by any person by requesting genetic testing pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7550). The notice of motion for genetic testing pursuant to this section shall be supported by a declaration under oath submitted by the moving party stating the factual basis for placing the issue of paternity before the court. The notice of motion for genetic testing shall be made within three years from the date of execution of the declaration by the attesting father, or by the attesting mother, whichever signature is later. The two-year statute of limitations specified in subdivision (b) of Section 7541 is inapplicable for purposes of this section.

(e) A presumption under this section shall override all statutory
 presumptions of paternity, except a presumption arising under Section 7540, a claim made pursuant to Section 7555, or as provided in Section 7612.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 45.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. UNIFORM PARENTAGE ACT [7600. - 7730.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7600. - 7606.]

7600.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Parentage Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7601.

(a) “Natural parent” as used in this code means a nonadoptive parent established under this part, whether biologically related to the child or not.

(b) “Parent and child relationship” as used in this part means the legal relationship existing between a child and the child’s natural or adoptive parents incident to which the law confers or imposes rights, privileges, duties, and obligations. The term includes the mother and child relationship and the father and child relationship.

(c) This part does not preclude a finding that a child has a parent and child relationship with more than two parents.

(d) For purposes of state law, administrative regulations, court rules, government policies, common law, and any other provision or source of law governing the rights, protections, benefits, responsibilities, obligations, and duties of parents, any reference to two parents shall be interpreted to apply to every parent of a child where that child has been found to have more than two parents under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 564, Sec. 5.5.   (SB 274)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

The parent and child relationship extends equally to every child and to every parent, regardless of the marital status of the parents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

Section 3140 is applicable to proceedings pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7604.

A court may order pendente lite relief consisting of a custody or visitation order pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 3020) of Division 8, if the court finds both of the following:

(a) A parent and child relationship exists pursuant to Section 7540 or 7541.

(b) The custody or visitation order would be in the best interest of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 46.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7604.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, bills for pregnancy, childbirth, and genetic testing shall be admissible as evidence without third-party foundation testimony and shall constitute prima facie evidence of costs incurred for those services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7605.

(a) In any proceeding to establish physical or legal custody of a child or a visitation order under this part, and in any proceeding subsequent to entry of a related judgment, the court shall ensure that each party has access to legal representation to preserve each party’s rights by ordering, if necessary based on the income and needs assessments, one party, except a government entity, to pay to the other party, or to the other party’s attorney, whatever amount is reasonably necessary for attorney’s fees and for the cost of maintaining or defending the proceeding during the pendency of the proceeding.

(b) When a request for attorney’s fees and costs is made under this section, the court shall make findings on whether an award of attorney’s fees and costs is appropriate, whether there is a disparity in access to funds to retain counsel, and whether one party is able to pay for legal representation of both parties. If the findings demonstrate disparity in access and ability to pay, the court shall make an order awarding attorney’s fees and costs. A party who lacks the financial ability to hire an attorney may request, as an in pro per litigant, that the court order the other party, if that other party has the financial ability, to pay a reasonable amount to allow the unrepresented party to retain an attorney in a timely manner before proceedings in the matter go forward.

(c) Attorney’s fees and costs within this section may be awarded for legal services rendered or costs incurred before or after the commencement of the proceeding.

(d) The court shall augment or modify the original award for attorney’s fees and costs as may be reasonably necessary for the prosecution or defense of a proceeding described in subdivision (a), or any proceeding related thereto, including after any appeal has been concluded.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an application for a temporary order making, augmenting, or modifying an award of attorney’s fees, including a reasonable retainer to hire an attorney, or costs, or both, shall be made by motion on notice or by an order to show cause during the pendency of any proceeding described in subdivision (a).

(f) The court shall rule on an application for fees under this section within 15 days of the hearing on the motion or order to show cause. An order described in subdivision (a) may be made without notice by an oral motion in open court at either of the following times:

(1) At the time of the hearing of the cause on the merits.

(2) At any time before entry of judgment against a party whose default has been entered pursuant to Section 585 or 586 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The court shall rule on any motion made pursuant to this subdivision within 15 days and prior to the entry of any judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 107, Sec. 3.   (AB 1406)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7606.

As used in this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Assisted reproduction” means conception by any means other than sexual intercourse.

(b) “Assisted reproduction agreement” means a written contract that includes a person who intends to be the legal parent of a child or children born through assisted reproduction and that defines the terms of the relationship between the parties to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishing Parent and Child Relationship [7610. - 7614.]

7610.

The parent and child relationship may be established as follows:

(a) Between a child and the natural parent, it may be established by proof of having given birth to the child, or under this part.

(b) Between a child and an adoptive parent, it may be established by proof of adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 510, Sec. 2.   (AB 1403)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.

A person is presumed to be the natural parent of a child if the person meets the conditions provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7540) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7570) of Part 2 or in any of the following subdivisions:

(a) The presumed parent and the child’s natural mother are, or have been, married to each other and the child is born during the marriage, or within 300 days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce, or after a judgment of separation is entered by a court.

(b) Before the child’s birth, the presumed parent and the child’s natural mother have attempted to marry
 each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law, although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and either of the following is true:

(1) If the attempted marriage could be declared invalid only by a court, the child is born during the attempted marriage, or within 300 days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, or divorce.

(2) If the attempted marriage is invalid without a court order, the child is born within 300 days after the termination of cohabitation.

(c) After the child’s birth, the presumed parent and the child’s natural mother have married, or attempted to marry, each other by a marriage solemnized in apparent compliance with law,
 although the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and either of the following is true:

(1) With the presumed parent’s consent, the presumed parent is named as the child’s parent on the child’s birth certificate.

(2) The presumed parent is obligated to support the child under a written voluntary promise or by court order.

(d) The presumed parent receives the child into their home and openly holds out the child as their natural child. 

(e) The child is in utero after the death of the decedent and the conditions set forth in Section 249.5 of the Probate Code are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 87.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7611.5.

Where Section 7611 does not apply, a man shall not be presumed to be the natural father of a child if either of the following is true:

(a) The child was conceived as a result of an act in violation of Section 261 of the Penal Code and the father was convicted of that violation.

(b) The child was conceived as a result of an act in violation of Section 261.5 of the Penal Code, the father was convicted of that violation, and the mother was under the age of 15 years and the father was 21 years of age or older at the time of conception.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7612.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7540) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7570) of Part 2, a presumption under Section 7611 is a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof and may be rebutted in an appropriate action only by clear and convincing evidence.

(b) If two or more presumptions arise under Section 7611 that conflict with each other, or if one or more presumptions under Section 7611 conflict with a claim by a person identified as a genetic parent
 pursuant to Section 7555, the presumption that on the facts is founded on the weightier considerations of policy and logic controls. If one of the presumed parents is also a presumed parent under Section 7540, the presumption arising under Section 7540 may only be rebutted pursuant to Section 7541.

(c) In an appropriate action, a court may find that more than two persons with a claim to parentage under this division are parents if the court finds that recognizing only two parents would be detrimental to the child. In determining detriment to the child, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the harm of removing the child from a stable placement with a parent who has fulfilled the child’s physical needs and the child’s
 psychological needs for care and affection, and who has assumed that role for a substantial period of time. A finding of detriment to the child does not require a finding of unfitness of any of the parents or persons with a claim to parentage.

(d) Unless a court orders otherwise after making the determination specified in subdivision (c), a presumption under Section 7611 is rebutted by a judgment establishing parentage of the child by another person. 

(e) A person’s offer or refusal to sign a voluntary declaration of parentage may be considered as a factor, but shall not be determinative, as to the issue of legal parentage in a proceeding regarding the establishment or termination of parental rights.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 48.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.

(a) (1) If a woman conceives through assisted reproduction with semen or ova or both donated by a donor who is not the woman’s spouse, with the consent of another intended parent, that intended parent is treated in law as if that intended parent is the natural parent of a child thereby conceived. The other intended parent’s consent shall be in writing and signed by the other intended parent and the woman conceiving through assisted reproduction.

(2) Failure to consent in writing, as required by paragraph (1), does not preclude the court from finding that the intended parent consented if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that, prior to the
 conception of the child, the woman and the intended parent had an oral agreement that the woman and the intended parent would both be parents of the child.

(b) (1) The donor of semen provided to a licensed physician and surgeon or to a licensed sperm bank for use in assisted reproduction by a woman other than the donor’s spouse is treated in law as if the donor is not the natural parent of a child thereby conceived, unless the donor and the woman signed a written agreement before the conception of the child, that the donor would be a parent.

(2) If the semen is not provided to a licensed physician and surgeon or a licensed sperm bank as specified in paragraph (1), the donor of semen for use in assisted reproduction by a woman other than the donor’s spouse
 is treated in law as if the donor is not the natural parent of a child thereby conceived if either of the following are met:

(A) The donor and the woman signed a written agreement before conception that the donor would not be a parent.

(B) A court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child was conceived through assisted reproduction and that, prior to the conception of the child, the woman and the donor had an oral agreement that the donor would not be a parent.

(c) A person providing ova for use in assisted reproduction by a person other than the provider’s spouse or nonmarital partner is treated in law as if the provider is not the natural parent of a child thereby conceived unless the court finds satisfactory
 evidence that the provider of the ova, and each recipient, intended for that provider to have parental rights.

(d) (1) A provider of an embryo for use in assisted reproduction to an intended parent who is not the provider’s spouse or nonmarital partner is treated in law as if the provider is not the natural parent of a child thereby conceived unless the court finds satisfactory evidence that the provider and the intended parent intended for the provider to be a parent.

(2) If the provider of ova, semen, or embryos is not the original source of the ova or sperm, each original provider’s written consent to the donation is required unless that person has executed a writing to consent to the donation, or to waive or relinquish their right to the genetic material,
 or as otherwise ordered by a court of law.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, persons who are not married to one another and who share legal control over the disposition of embryos shall not be prevented from entering into a written agreement whereby one person renounces all legal interest in the embryos, with the specific intent that the person renouncing all legal interest shall not be a legal parent of any child conceived with use of the embryos, despite any prior oral or written agreements, or legal judgments to the contrary. After that interest has been renounced in a writing signed by all persons with legal interest in or control over disposition of the embryos, the renouncing person shall be treated in law as a donor, and not a legal parent. Upon execution of that agreement, the person who retains legal
 interest in and control over disposition of the embryos shall have the sole right to determine the use and disposition of the embryos, including the right to attempt conception of a child, subject to any limitation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). Either party may file the agreement with the court, and the court shall issue an order establishing the nonparentage of the donor.

(2) If persons who share legal control over and interest in one or more embryos are married to one another at the time of signing the agreement, the agreement shall only become legally binding upon the court’s entry of a final decree of dissolution that incorporates the agreement, after which the presumptions pursuant to Section 7540 or subdivisions (a), (b), or (c) of Section 7611 shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 851, Sec. 5.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7613.5.

(a) An intended parent may, but is not required to, use the forms set forth in this section to demonstrate the intent to be a legal parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction. These forms shall satisfy the writing requirement specified in Section 7613, and are designed to provide clarity regarding the intentions, at the time of conception, of intended parents using assisted reproduction. These forms do not affect any presumptions of parentage based on Section 7611, and do not preclude a court from considering any other claims to parentage under California statute or case law.

(b) These forms apply only in very limited circumstances. Please read the forms carefully
 to see if you qualify for use of the forms.

(c) These forms do not apply to assisted reproduction agreements for gestational carriers or surrogacy agreements.

(d) This section does not require the use of one of these forms to satisfy the writing requirement of Section 7613.

(e) The following are the optional California Statutory Forms for Assisted Reproduction:California Statutory Forms for Assisted Reproduction, Form 1:Two
 Married or Unmarried People Using Assisted Reproduction to Conceive a ChildUse this form if: You and another intended parent, who may be your spouse or registered domestic partner, are conceiving a child through assisted reproduction using sperm and/or egg donation; and one of you will be giving birth.WARNING: Signing this form does not terminate the parentage claim of a sperm donor. A sperm donor’s claim to parentage is terminated if the sperm is provided to a licensed physician and surgeon or to a licensed sperm bank prior to insemination, or if you conceive without having sexual intercourse and you have a written agreement signed by you and the donor that you will conceive using assisted
 reproduction and do not intend for the donor to be a parent, as required by Section 7613(b) of the Family Code.The laws about parentage of a child are complicated. You are strongly encouraged to consult with an attorney about your rights. Even if you do not fill out this form, a spouse or domestic partner of the parent giving birth is presumed to be a legal parent of any child born during the marriage or domestic partnership.This form demonstrates your intent to be parents of the child you plan to conceive
 through assisted reproduction using sperm and/or egg donation.I, ____________________ (print name of person not giving birth), intend to be a parent of a child that ____________________ (print name of person giving birth) will or has conceived through assisted reproduction using sperm and/or egg donation. I consent to the use of assisted reproduction by the person who will give birth. I INTEND to be a parent of the child conceived.SIGNATURESIntended parent who will give birth: ___________________ (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)Intended parent who will not give birth: ____________ (print name)_________________________ (signature) ___________(date)NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENTState of CaliforniaCounty of )On before me, (insert name and title of the officer)personally appeared ,who proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence to be the person(s) whose name(s) is/are subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged to me that he/she/they executed the same in his/her/their authorized capacity, and that by his/her/their signature(s) on the instrument the person(s), or the entity upon behalf of which the person(s) acted, executed the instrument.I certify under PENALTY OF PERJURY under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing
 paragraph is true and correct.WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature(Seal)California Statutory Forms for Assisted Reproduction, Form 2:Unmarried, Intended Parents Using Intended Parent’s Sperm to Conceive a ChildUse this form if: (1) Neither you or the other person are married or in a registered domestic partnership (including a registered domestic partnership or civil union from another state); (2) one of you will give birth to a child conceived through assisted reproduction using the intended parent’s sperm; and (3) you both intend to be parents of that child.Do not use this form if you are conceiving using a surrogate.WARNING: If you do not sign this form, or a similar agreement,
 you may be treated as a sperm donor if you conceive without having sexual intercourse according to Section 7613(b) of the Family Code.The laws about parentage of a child are complicated. You are strongly encouraged to consult with an attorney about your rights.This form demonstrates your intent to be parents of the child you plan to conceive through assisted reproduction using sperm donation.I, ____________________ (print name of parent
 giving birth), plan to use assisted reproduction with another intended parent who is providing sperm to conceive the child. I am not married and am not in a registered domestic partnership (including a registered domestic partnership or civil union from
 another jurisdiction), and I INTEND for the person providing sperm to be a parent of the child to be conceived.I, ____________________ (print name of parent providing sperm), plan to use assisted reproduction to conceive a child using my sperm with the parent giving birth. I am not married and am not in a registered domestic partnership (including a registered domestic partnership or civil union from another jurisdiction), and I INTEND to be a parent of the child to be conceived.SIGNATURESIntended parent giving birth: ___________________
 (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)Intended parent providing sperm: ____________ (print name)_________________________ (signature) ___________(date)NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENTState
 of CaliforniaCounty of )On before me, (insert name and title of the officer)personally appeared ,who proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence to be the person(s) whose name(s) is/are subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged to me that he/she/they executed the same in his/her/their authorized capacity, and that by his/her/their signature(s) on the instrument the person(s), or the entity upon behalf of which the
 person(s) acted, executed the instrument.I certify under PENALTY OF PERJURY under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing paragraph is true and correct.WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature(Seal)California Statutory Forms for Assisted Reproduction, Form 3:Intended Parents Conceiving a Child Using Eggs from One Parent and the Other Parent Will Give BirthUse this form if: You are conceiving a child using the eggs from one of you and the other person will give birth to the child; (2) and you both intend to be parents to that child.Do not use this form if you are conceiving using a surrogate.WARNING: Signing this form does not terminate the parentage claim of a sperm donor. A sperm donor’s claim to parentage is terminated if the sperm is provided to a licensed physician and surgeon or to a licensed sperm bank prior to insemination, or if you conceive without having sexual intercourse and you have a written agreement signed by you and the donor that you will conceive using assisted reproduction and do not intend for the donor to be a parent, as required by Section 7613(b) of the Family Code.The laws about parentage of a child are complicated. You are strongly encouraged to consult with an attorney about your rights.This form demonstrates your intent to be parents of the child you plan to conceive through assisted reproduction using eggs from one parent and the other parent will give birth to the child.I, ____________________ (print name of parent giving birth), plan to use assisted reproduction to conceive and give birth to a child with another person who will provide eggs to conceive the child. I INTEND for the person providing eggs to be a parent of the child to be conceived.I, ____________________ (print name of parent providing
 eggs), plan to use assisted reproduction to conceive a child with another person who will give birth to the child conceived using my eggs. I INTEND to be a parent of the child to be conceived.SIGNATURESIntended parent giving birth: ___________________ (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)Intended parent providing eggs: ____________ (print name)_________________________ (signature) ___________(date)NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENTState of CaliforniaCounty of )On before me, (insert name and title of the officer)personally appeared
 ,who proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence to be the person(s) whose name(s) is/are subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged to me that he/she/they executed the same in his/her/their authorized capacity, and that by his/her/their signature(s) on the instrument the person(s), or the entity upon behalf of which the person(s) acted, executed the instrument.I certify under PENALTY OF PERJURY under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing paragraph is true and correct.WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature(Seal)California Statutory Forms for Assisted Reproduction, Form 4:Intended Parent(s) Using a Known Sperm and/or Egg Donor(s) to Conceive a ChildUse this form if: You are using a known sperm and/or egg donor(s), or embryo donation, to conceive a child and you
 do not intend for the donor(s) to be a parent.Do not use this form if you are conceiving using a surrogate.If you do not sign this form or a similar agreement, your sperm donor may be treated as a parent unless the sperm is provided to a licensed physician and surgeon or to a licensed sperm bank prior to insemination, or a court finds by clear and convincing evidence that you planned to conceive through assisted reproduction and did not intend for the donor to be a parent, as required by Section 7613(b) of the Family Code. If you do not sign this form or a similar agreement, your egg donor may be treated as a parent unless a court finds that there is satisfactory evidence that you planned to
 conceive through assisted reproduction and did not intend for the donor to be a parent, as required by Section 7613(c) of the Family Code.The laws about parentage of a child are complicated. You are strongly encouraged to consult with an attorney about your rights.This form demonstrates your intent that your sperm and/or egg or embryo donor(s) will not be a parent or parents of the child you plan to conceive through assisted reproduction.I,
 ____________________ (print name of parent giving birth), plan to use assisted reproduction to conceive using a sperm and/or egg donor(s) or embryo donation, and I DO NOT INTEND for the sperm and/or egg or embryo donor(s) to be a parent of the child to be conceived.(If applicable) I, ____________________ (print name of sperm donor), plan to donate my sperm to____________________ (print name of parent giving birth and second parent if applicable). I am not married to and am not in a registered domestic partnership (including a registered domestic partnership or a civil union from another jurisdiction) with ____________________ (print name of parent giving birth), and
 I DO NOT INTEND to be a parent of the child to be conceived.(If applicable) I, ____________________ (print name of egg donor), plan to donate my ova to____________________ (print name of parent giving birth and second parent if applicable). I am not married to and am not in a registered domestic partnership (including a registered domestic partnership or a civil union from another jurisdiction) with ____________________ (print name of parent giving birth), or any intimate and nonmarital relationship with ____________________ (print name of parent giving birth) and I DO NOT INTEND to be a parent of the child to be conceived.(If
 applicable) I, ____________________ (print name of intended parent not giving birth), INTEND to be a parent of the child that____________________ (print name of parent giving birth) will conceive through assisted reproduction using sperm and/or egg donation and I DO NOT INTEND for the sperm and/or egg or embryo donor(s) to be a parent. I consent to the use of assisted reproduction by the person who will give birth.SIGNATURESIntended parent giving birth: ___________________ (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)(If applicable) Sperm Donor: ___________________ (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)(If applicable) Egg Donor: ___________________ (print name)________________________ (signature) ____________(date)(If applicable) Intended parent not giving birth: ____________ (print name)_________________________ (signature) ___________(date)NOTARY ACKNOWLEDGMENTState of CaliforniaCounty of )On before me, (insert name and title of the officer)personally appeared
 ,who proved to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence to be the person(s) whose name(s) is/are subscribed to the within instrument and acknowledged to me that he/she/they executed the same in his/her/their authorized capacity, and that by his/her/their signature(s) on the instrument the person(s), or the entity upon behalf of which the person(s) acted, executed the instrument.I certify under PENALTY OF PERJURY under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing paragraph is true and correct.WITNESS my hand and official seal.Signature(Seal)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 89.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7614.

(a) A promise in writing to furnish support for a child, growing out of a presumed parent or alleged father and child relationship, does not require consideration and, subject to Section 7632, is enforceable according to its terms.

(b) In the best interest of the child or the other parent, the court may, and upon the promisor’s request shall, order the promise to be kept in confidence and designate a person or agency to receive and disburse on behalf of the child all amounts paid in performance of the promise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 510, Sec. 6.   (AB 1403)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Jurisdiction and Venue [7620. - 7620.]

7620.

(a) A person who has sexual intercourse or causes conception with the intent to become a legal parent by assisted reproduction in this state, or who enters into an assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers in this state, thereby submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to an action brought under this part with respect to a child who may have been conceived by that act of intercourse or assisted reproduction, or who may have been conceived as a result of that assisted reproduction agreement. 

(b) If a child is conceived pursuant to an assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers, as defined in Section 7960 and as described in Section 7962, the
 courts of this state shall have jurisdiction over a proceeding to determine parentage of the child if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) One or more of the parties to the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers resides in this state, or resided in this state at the time the assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers was executed.

(2) The medical procedures leading to conception, including in vitro fertilization or embryo transfer, or both, were carried out in this state.

(3) The child is born in this state.

(c) An action under this part shall be brought in one of the following:

(1) The county in which the child resides or is found.

(2) If the child is the subject of a pending or proposed adoption, any county in which a licensed California adoption agency to which the child has been relinquished or is proposed to be relinquished maintains an office.

(3) If the child is the subject of a pending or proposed adoption, the county in which an office of the department or a public adoption agency investigating the petition is located.

(4) If the parent is deceased, the county in which proceedings for probate of the estate of the parent of the child have been or could be commenced.

(5) If the child was conceived pursuant to an assisted reproduction agreement for gestational carriers, any county described in subdivision (e) of Section 7962.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 385, Sec. 3.   (AB 2349)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Determination of Parent and Child Relationship [7630. - 7650.]



  ARTICLE 1. Determination of Parent and Child Relationship [7630. - 7644.]

7630.

(a) A child, the child’s natural mother, a person presumed to be the child’s parent under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 7611, a person seeking to be adjudicated as a parent or donor under Section 7613, an adoption agency to whom the child has been relinquished, or a prospective adoptive parent of the child may bring an action as follows:

(1) At any time for the purpose of declaring the existence of the parent and child relationship presumed under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 7611, or established pursuant to Section 7613.

(2) For the purpose of declaring the nonexistence of the parent and child relationship presumed under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 7611 only if the
 action is brought within a reasonable time after obtaining knowledge of relevant facts. After the presumption has been rebutted, parentage of the child by another person may be determined in the same action, if that person has been made a party.

(3) At any time for the purpose of declaring the nonexistence of the parent and child relationship of a donor under Section 7613.

(b) Any interested party may bring an action at any time for the purpose of determining the existence or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship presumed under subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 7611.

(c) Except as to cases coming within Chapter 1
 (commencing with Section 7540) of Part 2 or when paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) applies, an action to determine parentage may be brought by the child, a personal representative of the child, the Department of Child Support Services, a presumed parent or the personal representative or a parent of that presumed parent if that parent has died or is a minor, or, when the natural mother is the only presumed parent or an action under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or adoption is pending, a man alleged or claiming to be the father or the personal representative or a parent of the alleged father if the alleged father has died or is a minor.
